Utah statutes.
72-3-106.   Actions to determine priority of use of public roads.

(1) The county attorney under the direction of the county legislative body shall determine a priority of public use of all county roads.

(2)  This action may be instigated by the written request of 10 taxpayers of the county to the county legislative body.

(3)  The county legislative body shall request the county attorney to instigate action within a reasonable length of time.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

